Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-132
Examinations; application; fees.

Any person desiring to take an examination for credentialing purposes shall make application to the department or to the organization specified by the department prior to examination on a form provided by the department or such organization. Such application shall be accompanied by the examination fee and such documents and affidavits as are necessary to show the eligibility of the candidate to take such examination. All applications shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department or such organization. When a national or standardized examination is required, the department may direct the applicant to apply directly to the organization administering the examination to take the examination.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 25, p. 460;

C.S.1929, § 71-401;

R.S.1943, § 71-125;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 14;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 36;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 28;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 13;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-125;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 32.